Utah statutes.
4-17-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the county legislative body of the counties of this state.

(2)  "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture and food or the commissioner's representative.

(3)  "County noxious weed" means any plant which is not on the state noxious weed list, is especially troublesome in a particular county, and is declared by the county legislative body to be a noxious weed within its county.

(4)  "Noxious weed" means any plant the commissioner determines to be especially injurious to public health, crops, livestock, land, or other property.



Amended by Chapter 82, 1997 General Session

